Utah statutes.
19-6-820.   Powers and duties of the executive secretary.
(1)  The executive secretary shall:
(a)  administer and enforce the rules and orders of the board;
(b)  issue and revoke registrations for waste tire recyclers and transporters;
and
(c)  require forms, analyses, documents, maps, and other records as the
executive secretary finds necessary to:
(i)  issue recycler and transporter registrations;
(ii) authorize reimbursements under Section 19-6-811;
(iii)  inspect a site, facility, or activity regulated under this part; and
(iv)  issue permits for and inspect waste tire storage sites.
(2)  The executive secretary may:
(a)  authorize any division employee to enter any site or facility regulated
under this part at reasonable times and upon presentation of credentials, for
the purpose of inspection, audit, or sampling:
(i)  at the site or facility; or
(ii)  of the records, operations, or products;
(b)  as authorized by the board, enforce board rules by issuing orders which
are subsequently subject to the board's amendment or revocation; and
(c)  coordinate with federal, state, and local governments, and other
agencies, including entering into memoranda of understanding, to:
(i)  ensure effective regulation of waste tires under this part;
(ii)  minimize duplication of regulation; and
(iii)  encourage responsible recycling of waste tires.
